Washington statutes.
RCW 19.255.040

Consumer protection.

(1) Any waiver of the provisions of this chapter is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(2) The attorney general may bring an action in the name of the state, or as parens patriae on behalf of persons residing in the state, to enforce this chapter. For actions brought by the attorney general to enforce this chapter, the legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. For actions brought by the attorney general to enforce this chapter, a violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for purposes of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. An action to enforce this chapter may not be brought under RCW 19.86.090.

(3)(a) Any consumer injured by a violation of this chapter may institute a civil action to recover damages.

(b) Any person or business that violates, proposes to violate, or has violated this chapter may be enjoined.

(c) The rights and remedies available under this chapter are cumulative to each other and to any other rights and remedies available under law.

[ 2019 c 241 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 241: See note following RCW 19.255.010.